HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
# Taýýarlan: Nazar Mämmedow 2015-2025.
LANG tk_TM
SET UTF-8
TRY ÜüÖöÇçŞşÄäŽžŇňÝýwertyuopasdfghjklzbnmWERTYUOPASDFGHJKLZXBNM-
FLAG num

#BREAK 0
BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK --

NOSPLITSUGS
#MAXDIFF 3

COMPOUNDMIN 1
WORDCHARS -0123456789

ONLYINCOMPOUND 9009

COMPOUNDRULE 6
COMPOUNDRULE (9001)*(9002)(9000)
COMPOUNDRULE (9001)*(9003)(9011)
COMPOUNDRULE (9001)*(9004)(9012)
COMPOUNDRULE (9001)*(9003)(9005)
COMPOUNDRULE (9001)*(9004)(9006)
COMPOUNDRULE (90)*(90)

REP 23
REP n ň
REP ň n
REP l n
REP ü u
REP u ü
REP ö o
REP o ö
REP ş s
REP s ş
REP z s
REP s z
REP a ä
REP ä a
REP y ý
REP ý y
REP ç c
REP c ç
REP y i
REP i y
REP anyndan andan
REP eninden enden
REP meklik mek
REP mekligi megi

SFX 11 N 175
SFX 11 0 nyň .
SFX 11 0 ny .
SFX 11 0 da .
SFX 11 0 dan .
SFX 11 0 m .
SFX 11 0 myň .
SFX 11 0 ma .
SFX 11 0 my .
SFX 11 0 mda .
SFX 11 0 mdan .
SFX 11 0 ň .
SFX 11 0 ňa .
SFX 11 0 ňy .
SFX 11 0 ňda .
SFX 11 0 ňdan .
SFX 11 0 sy .
SFX 11 0 synyň .
SFX 11 0 syna .
SFX 11 0 syny .
SFX 11 0 synda .
SFX 11 0 syndan .
SFX 11 0 myz .
SFX 11 0 myzyň .
SFX 11 0 myza .
SFX 11 0 myzy .
SFX 11 0 myzda .
SFX 11 0 myzdan .
SFX 11 0 ňyz .
SFX 11 0 ňyzyň .
SFX 11 0 ňyza .
SFX 11 0 ňyzy .
SFX 11 0 ňyzda .
SFX 11 0 ňyzdan .
SFX 11 0 lary .
SFX 11 0 larynyň .
SFX 11 0 laryna .
SFX 11 0 laryny .
SFX 11 0 larynda .
SFX 11 0 laryndan .
SFX 11 0 sydyryn .
SFX 11 0 sysyň .
SFX 11 0 sydyr .
SFX 11 0 sydyrys .
SFX 11 0 sysyňyz .
SFX 11 0 sydyrlar .
SFX 11 0 mdaky .
SFX 11 0 mdakynyň .
SFX 11 0 mdaka .
SFX 11 0 mdakyny .
SFX 11 0 mdakyda .
SFX 11 0 mdakydan .
SFX 11 0 ňdaky .
SFX 11 0 ňdakynyň .
SFX 11 0 ňdaka .
SFX 11 0 ňdakyny .
SFX 11 0 ňdakyda .
SFX 11 0 ňdakydan .
SFX 11 0 syndaky .
SFX 11 0 syndakynyň .
SFX 11 0 syndaka .
SFX 11 0 syndakyny .
SFX 11 0 syndakyda .
SFX 11 0 syndakydan .
SFX 11 0 myzdaky .
SFX 11 0 myzdakynyň .
SFX 11 0 myzdaka .
SFX 11 0 myzdakyny .
SFX 11 0 myzdakyda .
SFX 11 0 myzdakydan .
SFX 11 0 ňyzdaky .
SFX 11 0 ňyzdakynyň .
SFX 11 0 ňyzdaka .
SFX 11 0 ňyzdakyny .
SFX 11 0 ňyzdakyda .
SFX 11 0 ňyzdakydan .
SFX 11 0 laryndaky .
SFX 11 0 laryndakynyň .
SFX 11 0 laryndaka .
SFX 11 0 laryndakyny .
SFX 11 0 laryndakyda .
SFX 11 0 laryndakydan .
SFX 11 0 ly .
SFX 11 0 syz .
SFX 11 0 lar .
SFX 11 0 laryň .
SFX 11 0 lara .
SFX 11 0 lary .
SFX 11 0 larda .
SFX 11 0 lardan .
SFX 11 0 lardaky .
SFX 11 0 lardakynyň .
SFX 11 0 lardaka .
SFX 11 0 lardakyny .
SFX 11 0 lardakyda .
SFX 11 0 lardakydan .
SFX 11 0 larym .
SFX 11 0 larymyň .
SFX 11 0 laryma .
SFX 11 0 larymy .
SFX 11 0 larymda .
SFX 11 0 larymdan .
SFX 11 0 laryň .
SFX 11 0 laryňyň .
SFX 11 0 laryňa .
SFX 11 0 laryňy .
SFX 11 0 laryňda .
SFX 11 0 laryňdan .
SFX 11 0 larymyz .
SFX 11 0 larymyzyň .
SFX 11 0 larymyza .
SFX 11 0 larymyzy .
SFX 11 0 larymyzda .
SFX 11 0 larymyzdan .
SFX 11 0 laryňyz .
SFX 11 0 laryňyzyň .
SFX 11 0 laryňyza .
SFX 11 0 laryňyzy .
SFX 11 0 laryňyzda .
SFX 11 0 laryňyzdan .
SFX 11 0 daky .
SFX 11 0 dakynyň .
SFX 11 0 daka .
SFX 11 0 dakyny .
SFX 11 0 dakyda .
SFX 11 0 dakydan .
SFX 11 0 dakylar .
SFX 11 0 dakylaryň .
SFX 11 0 dakylara .
SFX 11 0 dakylary .
SFX 11 0 dakylarda .
SFX 11 0 dakylardan .
SFX 11 0 dyr .
SFX 11 0 lardyr .
SFX 11 0 dygym .
SFX 11 0 dygymyň .
SFX 11 0 dygyma .
SFX 11 0 dygymy .
SFX 11 0 dygymda .
SFX 11 0 dygymdan .
SFX 11 0 dygyň .
SFX 11 0 dygyňyň .
SFX 11 0 dygyňa .
SFX 11 0 dygyňy .
SFX 11 0 dygyňda .
SFX 11 0 dygyňdan .
SFX 11 0 dygy .
SFX 11 0 dygynyň .
SFX 11 0 dygyna .
SFX 11 0 dygyny .
SFX 11 0 dygynda .
SFX 11 0 dygyndan .
SFX 11 0 dygymyz .
SFX 11 0 dygymyzyň .
SFX 11 0 dygymyza .
SFX 11 0 dygymyzy .
SFX 11 0 dygymyzda .
SFX 11 0 dygymyzdan .
SFX 11 0 dygyňyz .
SFX 11 0 dygyňyzyň .
SFX 11 0 dygyňyza .
SFX 11 0 dygyňyzy .
SFX 11 0 dygyňyzda .
SFX 11 0 dygyňyzdan .
SFX 11 0 dyklary .
SFX 11 0 dyklarynyň .
SFX 11 0 dyklaryna .
SFX 11 0 dyklaryny .
SFX 11 0 dyklarynda .
SFX 11 0 dyklaryndan .
SFX 11 0 lyk .
SFX 11 0 lygyň .
SFX 11 0 lyga .
SFX 11 0 lygy .
SFX 11 0 lykda .
SFX 11 0 lykdan .
