HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
abstraksiýa/11
açylma/11
adamçy/11
adenoma/11
aeronawtika/11
agardyjy/11
agitgruppa/11
agrohimiýa/11
agsama/11
agyrlaşdyrma/11
agzala/11
ahyry/11
akdyrma/11
aklawçy/11
akupunktura/11
ala/11
alagaraňky/11
alamançy/11
albassy/11
alfa/11
alkymsa/11
alňasama/11
aly/11
amatly/11
amortizasiýa/11
analogiýa/11
angliýa/11
anonimika/11
antologiýa/11
aňka-taňka/11
aňtaýjy/11
apopleksiýa/11
arabaglanyşykly/11
arasalama/11
arena/11
arhitektonika/11
arkadaky/11
arma/11
arryklama/11
arwana/11
asalga/11
assa/11
assiriýa/11
asylgy/11
aşaky/11
aşyry/11
atlaşma/11
atyjy/11
awaza/11
awiarazwedkaçy/11
awstriýaly/11
awtoinspeksiýa/11
awtonomiýa/11
aýakgaply/11
aýgytlaýjy/11
aýna/11
aýratynlaýjy/11
aýyklaýjy/11
azaltma/11
aziýa/11
babatda/11
bady-saba/11
baglaşma/11
bagzy/11
baka-baka/11
bakteriologiýa/11
balahana/11
balneoterapiýa/11
banýa/11
barga/11
barlama/11
bary/11
basma/11
başaýlanma/11
başlama/11
batareýaçy/11
baýançy/11
baýtalça/11
begzada/11
benzokolonka/11
beýhuda/11
bilagyry/11
biografiýa/11
birtaraply/11
bogumçy/11
bolsa-da/11
bosaga/11
botswana/11
bozulma/11
budka/11
bulama/11
burça/11
buşlukçy/11
buýurma/11
çaga/11
çaklaýjy/11
çalaja/11
çaly/11
çaphana/11
çarpyşma/11
çatynja/11
çeçewisa/11
çokaýçy/11
çowdary/11
çydamly/11
çylka/11
çyrryldy/11
dagatma/11
dahylly/11
daniýaly/11
dargatma/11
dary/11
daşgary/11
dawaçy/11
deduksiýa/11
demgysma/11
deňagramlylaşdyrma/11
dermanhana/11
desmalçy/11
diagramma/11
dilhaty/11
dissertasiýa/11
doga/11
dogrulygyny/11
doktrina/11
doldurma/11
doňduryjy/11
dowamynda/11
doza/11
dura/11
durmuş-ykdysady/11
duýduryjy/11
düşegaşy/11
dykylma/11
dýužina/11
egri-bugry/11
ekspluatasiýa/11
elektrostansiýa/11
emallaýjy/11
ene-ata/11
epidemiýa/11
esasan-da/11
estoniýa/11
etrapara/11
ärsary/11
fanera/11
fauna/11
filologiýa/11
fizioterapiýa/11
fonetika/11
foto/11
funksiýa/11
gabawhana/11
gaçy/11
gahrymançylykly/11
galaýyçy/11
galmagalçy/11
galýusinasiýa/11
gamza/11
gaňňa/11
gaplama/11
garabasma/11
garalama/11
garaňda/11
garga/11
garmoniýa/11
garşy/11
garyndy/11
gatla/11
gatnatma/11
gaýana/11
gaýka/11
gaýra/11
gaýtargy/11
gaýza/11
gazly/11
gelinalyjy/11
geologiýa/11
gigakaloriýa/11
goja/11
golgarama/11
goňşokara/11
goranma/11
gorkunçly/11
goşmaça/11
goşuntgy/11
gowka/11
goýazy/11
gozganma/11
gözara/11
gözi-gara/11
griwna/11
guguldy/11
gumhana/11
guragyry/11
gurbaga/11
gurnaýjy/11
gussa/11
guýma/11
gülýaka/11
gürpbassy/11
gwozdika/11
gyjyndyryjy/11
gylyçlaşýançy/11
gynançly/11
gyraky/11
gyrkymçy/11
gyrymsy/11
gyssagly/11
gytyrdy/11
gyzma/11
habarlaşma/11
hajy/11
hakyda/11
hakynda/11
halky/11
halypa/11
hamyrturşy/11
hapalaýjy/11
haramy/11
harplama/11
hasapçy/11
hasratly/11
haşamlama/11
hatda/11
haýa/11
haýyrly/11
hemaýatçy/11
himiýa/11
holpuldy/11
horaşa/11
horsuldy/11
howala/11
howsala/11
hökümetara/11
hukukly/11
hususylaşdyrma/11
hyllalla/11
hyrra/11
hyşy-pyşy/11
hyýanatçy/11
ideýa/11
ikra/11
illýustrasiýa/11
indiýa/11
infeksiýa/11
inisiatiwa/11
instansiýa/11
intonasiýa/11
ipohondriýa/11
iş-alada/11
jaggyldy/11
jaňňyrdy/11
jaýlaşykly/11
jelephana/11
jokjoky/11
jöwza/11
jüýgüldy/11
jylawly/11
jyrryldy/11
žirafa/11
kafedra/11
kaloriýaly/11
kanagatlandyrma/11
kanunçy/11
kararly/11
karýera/11
kaýda/11
kellagyry/11
keniýa/11
keşara/11
kilokaloriýa/11
kinoçy/11
klassyky/11
kofta/11
kolonoýa/11
komissiýa/11
konferensiýa/11
konstruksiýa/11
korporasiýa/11
koýka/11
krapiwa/11
kuwwatly/11
kyblanama/11
labyzly/11
lakgyldy/11
lapba/11
lawanda/11
legenda/11
liniýa/11
litografiýa/11
lokga/11
lukma/11
maçja/11
magistratura/11
mahalynda/11
maksatnama/11
malhana/11
mandatly/11
manyly/11
marokko/11
massa/11
mawuja/11
maýotta/11
medisina/11
menýu/11
metallurgiýa/11
meýilnama/11
milletara/11
moda/11
monjugatdy/11
mugallyma/11
musa/11
müňbaşy/11
mynjama/11
nadara/11
naharhanada/11
nama/11
nawassa/11
nepaga/11
nika/11
nogtaly/11
nowella/11
nygtama/11
obrazly/11
oguznama/11
okkupasiýa/11
olary/11
onbaşy/11
onlarça/11
oňlama/11
opsiýa/11
orda/11
ornaşykly/11
ortara/11
otlama/11
owalky/11
owsarly/11
oýlanyjy/11
ozma/11
öňbaşçy/11
öňýany/11
özgylykly/11
pagyş-para/11
pakgyldy/11
palestina/11
pana/11
papua-gwineýa/11
parfiýa/11
parta/11
pasha/11
patdyldy/11
paýçy/11
paýyrdy/11
periferiýa/11
peşehorda/11
peýmana/11
pinokio/11
planetara/11
pleýonka/11
poeziýa/11
pomada/11
posylka/11
premiýa/11
programma/11
pružina/11
pukara/11
putýowka/11
pyrra/11
pyşyrdy/11
pyýala/11
radiogramma/11
radiotelefoniýa/11
raja/11
rawy/11
redkollegiýa/11
registrasiýa/11
rekwizisiýa/11
repetisiýa/11
respublikaçy/11
rifmaly/11
rowana/11
ruhany/11
ryswa/11
sadaka/11
sagyna-sagyna/11
sahypa/11
saklanma/11
salaty/11
salykatly/11
sanalgyja/11
sanksiýa/11
sapalakçy/11
sargama/11
satrapiýa/11
saýhally/11
sazanda/11
seda/11
sena/11
serenjamly/11
ses-seza/11
sezura/11
sigma/11
sinerariýa/11
sistema/11
siýdikhalta/11
sokma/11
soňabara/11
sosial-ykdysady/11
sowatly/11
sozma/11
spekulýasiýa/11
starşina/11
studiýa/11
sungatçy/11
suwagly/11
swodka/11
synçy/11
sypaýy/11
syrma/11
syýasatçy/11
şagalaňly/11
şahana/11
şahyra/11
şalkyldy/11
şaňňyrdy/11
şarkyldy/11
şatlama/11
şaýy/11
şetdaly/11
şlýapa/11
şorpuldy/11
şöhraty-şany/11
şunça/11
şybyrdy/11
şyňňyrdy/11
şyrky/11
tabaga/11
tagamlandyrma/11
tagmaly/11
takmyny/11
talaňçylykly/11
tamdyra/11
tankytçy/11
tapawutly/11
taraçy/11
tarpa/11
tarypçy/11
tassyknama/11
taýly/11
tazy/11
telefonogramma/11
tendensiýa/11
terminologiýa/11
täleýnama/11
tizara/11
toka/11
tolgunma/11
tonna/11
toponimika/11
towça/11
tozama/11
tragikomediýa/11
transplantasiýa/11
trilogiýa/11
tumakly/11
tussaghana/11
tutuşlagyna/11
tygşytly/11
tyrňyldy/11
ugurlaşykly/11
ukyda/11
ulitka/11
ura-ura/11
ussahana/11
utgaşma/11
uzadyjy/11
ünji-alada/11
wagtlaýynça/11
wahaly/11
wanna/11
wassyldy/11
wazyrdy/11
wepaly/11
wideoçy/11
wolga/11
ybadathana/11
yhlasly/11
ylahy/11
ylmy/11
ynanja/11
ynsany/11
yrma/11
yssy/11
yşyklandyryjy/11
yzly-yzyna/11
ýaba/11
ýagly/11
ýagynly/11
ýakymly/11
ýalçy/11
ýalpyldy/11
ýamaly/11
ýanyjy/11
ýaňra/11
ýapgy/11
ýapyşalga/11
ýaragsyzlanma/11
ýardamçy/11
ýarpy/11
ýarym-ýalta/11
ýaşama/11
ýatlama/11
ýaýradyjy/11
ýazyjy/11
ýeralma/11
ýnançly/11
ýokarlandyrma/11
ýokumly/11
ýollama/11
ýonutgy/11
ýumrujy/11
ýurisdiksiýa/11
ýuwusga/11
ýygnama/11
ýygy-ýygy/11
ýyldan-ýyla/11
ýylyň-ýylyna/11
zamça/11
zastawa/11
zer-zaýa/11
zoologiýa/11
zyba/11
zyňyndy/11
toksikomaniýa/11
akina/11
agzasy/11
bütinrussiýa/11
kulturologiýa/11
hartiýa/11
braziliýa/11
metrologiýa/11
gaaga/11
segregasiýa/11
bagaja/11
newrologiýa/11
